Washington statutes.
RCW 4.36.120

Libel or slander, how pleaded.

In an action for libel or slander, it shall not be necessary to state in the complaint any extrinsic facts, for the purpose of showing the application to the plaintiff, of the defamatory matter out of which the cause arose, but it shall be sufficient to state generally, that the same was published or spoken concerning the plaintiff; and if such allegation be controverted, the plaintiff shall be bound to establish on trial that it was so published or spoken.

[Code 1881 s 99; 1877 p 22 s 99; 1854 p 142 s 61; RRS s 292.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 8.